Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6652YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 2586 Section 1. Section 321.215, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 The department , on application, may issue a temporary 4 restricted license to a person whose noncommercial driverâs 5 license is suspended or revoked under this chapter , allowing 6 the person to drive to and from the personâs home and specified 7 places at specified times which can be verified by the 8 department and which are required by any of the following: if 9 the person submits an application for the temporary restricted 10 license with the required fee and provides proof the person 11 successfully completed a remedial driver improvement action. 12 A person holding a temporary restricted license may operate a 13 motor vehicle in any manner allowed for a person issued a valid 14 class C driverâs license. 15 Sec. 2. Section 321.215, subsection 1, paragraph a, 16 subparagraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6), Code 2026, are 17 amended by striking the subparagraphs. 18 Sec. 3. Section 321.215, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 20 Sec. 4. Section 321J.20A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 21 amended by striking the subsection. 22 Sec. 5. PREVIOUSLY ISSUED TEMPORARY RESTRICTED LICENSES. A 23 person who holds a temporary restricted license that was issued 24 under section 321.215, Code 2026, before the effective date 25 of this Act shall not be required to successfully complete a 26 remedial driver improvement action and may continue to operate 27 a motor vehicle in accordance with section 321.215, Code 2026, 28 on and after the effective date of this Act. 29